District of Columbia statutes.
2-1204.13

References.

All references in statutes, regulations, rules, orders, and other official documents to the “Film DC Economic Incentive Fund,” “Incentive Awardee,” and “incentive agreement” shall be deemed to refer, respectively, to the “Film, Television and Entertainment Rebate Fund,” “Rebate Awardee” and “rebate agreement.”

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-290, § 3a
as added Mar. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-81, § 2(f), 62 DCR 768